New York, session 2025-2026, S8781.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1 of a chapter of the laws of 2025 relating to 2 authorizing the Thiells-Roseville Fire District to file an application 3 for exemption from school taxes and real property taxes, as proposed in 4 legislative bills numbers S. 6428 and A. 6657, is amended to read as 5 follows: 6 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 7 the assessor of the town of Haverstraw, county of Rockland, is hereby 8 authorized to accept from the Thiells-Roseville Fire District, an appli- 9 cation for exemption from school taxes and real property taxes pursuant 10 to section [464] 410 of the real property tax law with respect to the 11 2024-2025 assessment roll, for the parcels owned by such organization, 12 with such parcels being located at 1 Angelus Drive, 69 West Ramapo Road, 13 63 West Ramapo Road, 63A West Ramapo Road, and 65 West Ramapo Road in 14 the town of Haverstraw, county of Rockland, otherwise known as Rockland 15 county tax map, sections 26.09-4-11, 26.09-4-12, 26.09-4-15, 26.09-4-14, 16 and 26.09-4-13. 17 If accepted, the application shall be reviewed as if it had been 18 received on or before the taxable status date established for such roll. 19 If satisfied that such organization would otherwise be entitled to such 20 exemption if such organization had filed an application for exemption by 21 the appropriate taxable status date, the assessor, upon approval by the 22 town of Haverstraw governing board, may grant exemption from all taxa- 23 tion and make appropriate corrections to the subject roll. If such 24 exemption is granted and such organization therefore shall have paid any 25 tax with respect to the subject roll, the applicable governing body or EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09602-03-6 S. 8781 2 1 tax department may, in its sole discretion, provide for the refund of 2 the taxes paid, along with any fines or penalties paid, and cancel any 3 taxes, fines, penalties, interest, or tax liens remaining unpaid. 4 § 2. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 5 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2025 relating to authorizing the 6 Thiells-Roseville Fire District to file an application for exemption 7 from school taxes and real property taxes, as proposed in legislative 8 bills numbers S. 6428 and A. 6657, takes effect.